src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    ab+N+Sg+Nom: aʼb
    ab+N+Sg+Gen: aʼb
    ab+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõn
    ab+N+Sg+Par: aʼbbõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbkõks
    ab+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbsõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbstõ
    ab+N+Pl+Nom: abūd
    ab+N+Pl+Gen: abūd
    ab+N+Pl+Dat: abūdõn
    ab+N+Pl+Par: aʼbḑi
    ab+N+Pl+Ins: abūdõks
    ab+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbži
    ab+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbši
    ab+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbšti
    ab+N+Sg+Nom: aʼb
    ab+N+Sg+Gen: aʼb
    ab+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõn
    ab+N+Sg+Par: aʼbbõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbkõks
    ab+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbsõ
    ab+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbstõ
    ab+N+Pl+Nom: abūd
    ab+N+Pl+Gen: abūd
    ab+N+Pl+Dat: abūdõn
    ab+N+Pl+Par: aʼbḑi
    ab+N+Pl+Ins: abūdõks
    ab+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbži
    ab+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbši
    ab+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbšti
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbbõnd
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbbõnd
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbbõndõn
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Par: aʼbbiņi
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbbõndõks
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbbiņiž
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbbiņis
    abbõnd+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbbiņist
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbbõndajāji
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbbõndajājiz
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõndajājizõn
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Par: [aʼbbõndajājizt, aʼbbõndajājit]
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbbõndajājizõks
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõndajājizõ
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Ine: [aʼbbõndajājizõs, aʼbbõndajājis]
    abbõndajāji+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼbbõndajājizõst, aʼbbõndajājist]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Nom: [aʼbbõndajājizt, aʼbbõndajājid]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Gen: [aʼbbõndajājizt, aʼbbõndajājid]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Dat: [aʼbbõndajājiztõn, aʼbbõndajājidõn]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Par: [aʼbbõndajājiži, aʼbbõndajājidi]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Ins: [aʼbbõndajājiztõks, aʼbbõndajājidõks]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼbbõndajājižiz, aʼbbõndajājiži]
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbbõndajājižis
    abbõndajāji+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼbbõndajājižist, aʼbbõndajājisti]
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbbõnz
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbbõn
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõnõn
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Par: aʼbbõnt
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbbõnõks
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõnõ
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbbõnõs
    abbõnz+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbbõnõst
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbbõnd
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbbõnd
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbbõndõn
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Par: aʼbbiņi
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbbõndõks
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbbiņiž
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbbiņis
    abbõnz+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbbiņist
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbbõrz
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbbõr
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõrõn
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Par: aʼbbõrzt
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbbõrõks
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõrõ
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbbõrõs
    abbõrz+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbbõrõst
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbbõrd
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbbõrd
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbbõrdõn
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Par: aʼbbiri
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbbõrdõks
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbbiriž
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbbiris
    abbõrz+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbbirist
    abesīv+N+Sg+Nom: abesīv
    abesīv+N+Sg+Gen: abesīv
    abesīv+N+Sg+Dat: abesīvõn
    abesīv+N+Sg+Par: abesīvõ
    abesīv+N+Sg+Ins: abesīvõks
    abesīv+N+Sg+Ill: abesīvõ
    abesīv+N+Sg+Ine: abesīvs
    abesīv+N+Sg+Ela: abesīvst
    abesīv+N+Pl+Nom: abesīvõd
    abesīv+N+Pl+Gen: abesīvõd
    abesīv+N+Pl+Dat: abesīvõdõn
    abesīv+N+Pl+Par: abesīvidi
    abesīv+N+Pl+Ins: abesīvõdõks
    abesīv+N+Pl+Ill: abesīviž
    abesīv+N+Pl+Ine: abesīvis
    abesīv+N+Pl+Ela: abesīvist
    ābets+N+Sg+Nom: ābets
    ābets+N+Sg+Gen: ābets
    ābets+N+Sg+Dat: ābetsõn
    ābets+N+Sg+Par: ābetsõ
    ābets+N+Sg+Ins: ābetsõks
    ābets+N+Sg+Ill: ābetsõ
    ābets+N+Sg+Ine: ābetsõs
    ābets+N+Sg+Ela: ābetsõst
    ābets+N+Pl+Nom: ābetsõd
    ābets+N+Pl+Gen: ābetsõd
    ābets+N+Pl+Dat: ābetsõdõn
    ābets+N+Pl+Par: ābetsidi
    ābets+N+Pl+Ins: ābetsõdõks
    ābets+N+Pl+Ill: ābetsiž
    ābets+N+Pl+Ine: ābetsis
    ābets+N+Pl+Ela: ābetsist
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbjelāmi
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbjelāmiz
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbjelāmizõn
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Par: aʼbjelāmizt
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbjelāmizõks
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbjelāmizõ
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbjelāmizõs
    abjelāmi+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbjelāmizõst
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbjelāmizt
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbjelāmizt
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbjelāmiztõn
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Par: aʼbjelāmiži
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbjelāmiztõks
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbjelāmižiz
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbjelāmižis
    abjelāmi+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbjelāmižist
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Nom: ablatīv
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Gen: ablatīv
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Dat: ablatīvõn
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Par: ablatīvõ
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Ins: ablatīvõks
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Ill: ablatīvõ
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Ine: ablatīvs
    ablatīv+N+Sg+Ela: ablatīvst
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Nom: ablatīvõd
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Gen: ablatīvõd
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Dat: ablatīvõdõn
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Par: ablatīvidi
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Ins: ablatīvõdõks
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Ill: ablatīviž
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Ine: ablatīvis
    ablatīv+N+Pl+Ela: ablatīvist
    abli+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbli
    abli+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbliz
    abli+N+Sg+Dat: aʼblizõn
    abli+N+Sg+Par: aʼblizt
    abli+N+Sg+Ins: aʼblizõks
    abli+N+Sg+Ill: aʼblizõ
    abli+N+Sg+Ine: aʼblizõs
    abli+N+Sg+Ela: aʼblizõst
    abli+N+Pl+Nom: aʼblizt
    abli+N+Pl+Gen: aʼblizt
    abli+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbliztõn
    abli+N+Pl+Par: aʼbliži
    abli+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbliztõks
    abli+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbližiz
    abli+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbližis
    abli+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbližist
    ablū+N+Sg+Nom: aʼblū
    ablū+N+Sg+Gen: aʼblū
    ablū+N+Sg+Dat: aʼblūn
    ablū+N+Sg+Par: aʼblūdõ
    ablū+N+Sg+Ins: aʼblūkõks
    ablū+N+Sg+Ill: aʼblūʼzõ
    ablū+N+Sg+Ine: aʼblūsõ
    ablū+N+Sg+Ela: aʼblūstõ
    ablū+N+Pl+Nom: aʼblūd
    ablū+N+Pl+Gen: aʼblūd
    ablū+N+Pl+Dat: aʼblūdõn
    ablū+N+Pl+Par: aʼblūḑi
    ablū+N+Pl+Ins: aʼblūdkõks
    ablū+N+Pl+Ill: aʼblūʼži
    ablū+N+Pl+Ine: aʼblūši
    ablū+N+Pl+Ela: aʼblūšti
    abni+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbni
    abni+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbniz
    abni+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbnizõn
    abni+N+Sg+Par: aʼbnizt
    abni+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbnizõks
    abni+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbnizõ
    abni+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbnizõs
    abni+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbnizõst
    abni+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbnizt
    abni+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbnizt
    abni+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbniztõn
    abni+N+Pl+Par: aʼbniži
    abni+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbniztõks
    abni+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbnižiz
    abni+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbnižis
    abni+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbnižist
    abniki+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbniki
    abniki+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbnikiz
    abniki+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbnikizõn
    abniki+N+Sg+Par: aʼbnikizt
    abniki+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbnikizõks
    abniki+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbnikizõ
    abniki+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbnikizõs
    abniki+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbnikizõst
    abniki+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbnikizt
    abniki+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbnikizt
    abniki+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbnikiztõn
    abniki+N+Pl+Par: aʼbnikiži
    abniki+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbnikiztõks
    abniki+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbnikižiz
    abniki+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbnikižis
    abniki+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbnikižist
    abpūol+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbpūol
    abpūol+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbpūol
    abpūol+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbpūolõn
    abpūol+N+Sg+Par: aʼbpūoldõ
    abpūol+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbpūolkõks
    abpūol+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbpūolõ
    abpūol+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbpūolsõ
    abpūol+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbpūolstõ
    abpūol+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbpūold
    abpūol+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbpūold
    abpūol+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbpūoldõn
    abpūol+N+Pl+Par: aʼbpūoļi
    abpūol+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbpūoldkõks
    abpūol+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbpūoļiž
    abpūol+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbpūoļši
    abpūol+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbpūoļšti
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbrǭʼ
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbrǭʼ
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbrǭʼn
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Par: aʼbrǭʼdõ
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbrǭʼkõks
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbrǭʼzõ
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbrǭʼsõ
    abrǭ+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbrǭʼstõ
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbrǭʼd
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbrǭʼd
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbrǭʼdõn
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Par: aʼbrǭʼḑi
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbrǭʼdkõks
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbrǭʼži
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbrǭʼši
    abrǭ+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbrǭʼšti
    abskūol+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbskūol
    abskūol+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbskūol
    abskūol+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbskūolõn
    abskūol+N+Sg+Par: aʼbskūolõ
    abskūol+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbskūolõks
    abskūol+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbskūolõ
    abskūol+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbskūolsõ
    abskūol+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼbskūolstõ, aʼbskūolst]
    abskūol+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbskūolõd
    abskūol+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbskūolõd
    abskūol+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbskūolõdõn
    abskūol+N+Pl+Par: aʼbskūolidi
    abskūol+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbskūolõdõks
    abskūol+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbskūoliž
    abskūol+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbskūolis
    abskūol+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbskūolist
    absõnā+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbsõnā
    absõnā+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbsõnā
    absõnā+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbsõnān
    absõnā+N+Sg+Par: aʼbsõʼnnõ
    absõnā+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbsõnāks
    absõnā+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbsõʼnnõ
    absõnā+N+Sg+Ine: aʼbsõnās
    absõnā+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbsõnāst
    absõnā+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbsõnād
    absõnā+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbsõnād
    absõnā+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbsõnādõn
    absõnā+N+Pl+Par: aʼbsõʼņḑi
    absõnā+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbsõnādõks
    absõnā+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbsõʼņži
    absõnā+N+Pl+Ine: aʼbsõʼņši
    absõnā+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbsõʼņšti
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Nom: aʼddõrvīʼemõr
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Gen: aʼddõrvīʼemõr
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Dat: aʼddõrvīʼemõrõn
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Par: aʼddõrvīʼemõrt
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Ins: aʼddõrvīʼemõrõks
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Ill: aʼddõrvīʼemõrõ
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Ine: aʼddõrvīʼemõrõs
    addõrvīemõr+N+Sg+Ela: aʼddõrvīʼemõrõst
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Nom: aʼddõrvīʼemõrd
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Gen: aʼddõrvīʼemõrd
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Dat: aʼddõrvīʼemõrdõn
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Par: aʼddõrvīʼemõri
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Ins: aʼddõrvīʼemõrdõks
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Ill: aʼddõrvīʼemõriž
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Ine: aʼddõrvīʼemõris
    addõrvīemõr+N+Pl+Ela: aʼddõrvīʼemõrist
    addõrz+N+Sg+Nom: aʼddõrz
    addõrz+N+Sg+Gen: aʼddõr
    addõrz+N+Sg+Dat: aʼddõrõn
    addõrz+N+Sg+Par: aʼddõrzt
    addõrz+N+Sg+Ins: aʼddõrõks
    addõrz+N+Sg+Ill: aʼddõrõ
    addõrz+N+Sg+Ine: aʼddõrõs
    addõrz+N+Sg+Ela: aʼddõrõst
    addõrz+N+Pl+Nom: aʼddõrd
    addõrz+N+Pl+Gen: aʼddõrd
    addõrz+N+Pl+Dat: aʼddõrdõn
    addõrz+N+Pl+Par: aʼddiri
    addõrz+N+Pl+Ins: aʼddõrdõks
    addõrz+N+Pl+Ill: aʼddiriž
    addõrz+N+Pl+Ine: aʼddiris
    addõrz+N+Pl+Ela: aʼddirist
    adesīv+N+Sg+Nom: adesīv
    adesīv+N+Sg+Gen: adesīv
    adesīv+N+Sg+Dat: adesīvõn
    adesīv+N+Sg+Par: adesīvõ
    adesīv+N+Sg+Ins: adesīvõks
    adesīv+N+Sg+Ill: adesīvõ
    adesīv+N+Sg+Ine: adesīvs
    adesīv+N+Sg+Ela: adesīvst
    adesīv+N+Pl+Nom: adesīvõd
    adesīv+N+Pl+Gen: adesīvõd
    adesīv+N+Pl+Dat: adesīvõdõn
    adesīv+N+Pl+Par: adesīvidi
    adesīv+N+Pl+Ins: adesīvõdõks
    adesīv+N+Pl+Ill: adesīviž
    adesīv+N+Pl+Ine: adesīvis
    adesīv+N+Pl+Ela: adesīvist
    adres+N+Sg+Nom: adres
    adres+N+Sg+Gen: adres
    adres+N+Sg+Dat: adresõn
    adres+N+Sg+Par: adresõ
    adres+N+Sg+Ins: adresõks
    adres+N+Sg+Ill: adresõ
    adres+N+Sg+Ine: adresõs
    adres+N+Sg+Ela: adresõst
    adres+N+Pl+Nom: adresõd
    adres+N+Pl+Gen: adresõd
    adres+N+Pl+Dat: adresõdõn
    adres+N+Pl+Par: adresidi
    adres+N+Pl+Ins: adressõdõks
    adres+N+Pl+Ill: adressiž
    adres+N+Pl+Ine: adressis
    adres+N+Pl+Ela: adressist
    advent+N+Sg+Nom: advent
    adventist+N+Sg+Nom: adventist
    adventist+N+Sg+Gen: adventist
    adventist+N+Sg+Dat: adventistõn
    adventist+N+Sg+Par: adventistõ
    adventist+N+Sg+Ins: adventistõks
    adventist+N+Sg+Ill: adventistõ
    adventist+N+Sg+Ine: adventistõs
    adventist+N+Sg+Ela: adventistõst
    adventist+N+Pl+Nom: adventistõd
    adventist+N+Pl+Gen: adventistõd
    adventist+N+Pl+Dat: adventistõdõn
    adventist+N+Pl+Par: adventistidi
    adventist+N+Pl+Ins: adventistõdõks
    adventist+N+Pl+Ill: adventistiž
    adventist+N+Pl+Ine: adventistis
    adventist+N+Pl+Ela: adventistist
    advokāt+N+Sg+Nom: advokāt
    advokāt+N+Sg+Gen: advokāt
    advokāt+N+Sg+Dat: advokātõn
    advokāt+N+Sg+Par: advokātõ
    advokāt+N+Sg+Ins: advokātõks
    advokāt+N+Sg+Ill: advokātõ
    advokāt+N+Sg+Ine: advokāts
    advokāt+N+Sg+Ela: advokātst
    advokāt+N+Pl+Nom: advokātõd
    advokāt+N+Pl+Gen: advokātõd
    advokāt+N+Pl+Dat: advokātõdõn
    advokāt+N+Pl+Par: advokātidi
    advokāt+N+Pl+Ins: advokātõdõks
    advokāt+N+Pl+Ill: advokātiž
    advokāt+N+Pl+Ine: advokātis
    advokāt+N+Pl+Ela: advokātist
    aerodrōm+N+Sg+Nom: aerodrōm
    aerodrōm+N+Sg+Gen: aerodrōm
    aerodrōm+N+Sg+Dat: aerodrōmõn
    aerodrōm+N+Sg+Par: aerodrōmõ
    aerodrōm+N+Sg+Ins: aerodrōmõks
